test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-16abilinw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - abilinõ: # Noun (16) abilinõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Nom: abilinõ
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Gen: abilisõ
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Par: abilist
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ill: abilistõ
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ine: abilisõn
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ela: abilisõst
     abilinõ+N+Sg+All: abilisõlõ
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ade: abilisõl
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Abl: abilisõlt
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Tra: abilisõs
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Ter: abilisõniq
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Abe: abilisõldaq
     abilinõ+N+Sg+Com: abilisõgaq
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Nom: abilisõq
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Gen: abiliisi
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Par: abiliisi
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ill: abiliisihe
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ine: abiliisin
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ela: abiliisist
     abilinõ+N+Pl+All: abiliisilõ
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ade: abiliisil
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Abl: abiliisilt
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Tra: abiliisis
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Ter: abiliisiniq
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Abe: abiliisildaq
     abilinõ+N+Pl+Com: abiliisigaq
